Nevada, session 83, AB120.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 233B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. In addition to the requirements of NRS 233B.0608 and
233B.0609, before conducting a workshop for a proposed
regulation pursuant to NRS 233B.061, an agency shall determine
the estimated economic impact of the proposed regulation. The
economic impact must, without limitation:
(a) Be expressed as a single dollar figure.
(b) Include the costs for the agency to implement the proposed
regulation and the costs that are reasonably expected to be
incurred by or passed along to businesses, local governments and
any other person, which may include any economic burden
imposed on small businesses, as determined by the agency
pursuant to NRS 233B.0608.
2. If the agency determines that the estimated economic
impact of the proposed regulation is $500,000 or more, the
agency:
(a) May not adopt the proposed regulation; and
(b) Shall submit the proposed regulation to the Director of the
Office of Finance as a legislative measure for the approval of the
Legislature and the Governor pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 218D of NRS.
Sec. 2. NRS 233B.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233B.040 1. [To] Except as otherwise provided in
subsection 2 and section 1 of this act, to the extent authorized by
the statutes applicable to it, each agency may adopt reasonable
regulations to aid it in carrying out the functions assigned to it by
law and shall adopt such regulations as are necessary to the proper
execution of those functions. If adopted and filed in accordance with
the provisions of this chapter, the following regulations have the
force of law and must be enforced by all peace officers:
(a) The Nevada Administrative Code; and
(b) Temporary and emergency regulations.
 In every instance, the power to adopt regulations to carry out a
particular function is limited by the terms of the grant of authority
pursuant to which the function was assigned.
2. An agency may not adopt a proposed regulation if the
agency determines, pursuant to section 1 of this act, that the
proposed regulation has an estimated economic impact of
$500,000 or more.
3. Every regulation adopted by an agency must include:
-
*AB120*

– 3 –
(a) A citation of the authority pursuant to which it, or any part of
it, was adopted; and
(b) The address of the agency and, to the extent not elsewhere
provided in the regulation, a brief explanation of the procedures for
obtaining clarification of the regulation or relief from the strict
application of any of its terms, if the agency is authorized by a
specific statute to grant such relief, or otherwise dealing with the
agency in connection with the regulation.
[3.] 4. An agency may adopt by reference in a regulation
material published by another authority in book or pamphlet form if:
(a) It files one copy of the publication with the Secretary of
State and one copy with the State Library, Archives and Public
Records Administrator, and makes at least one copy available for
public inspection with its regulations; and
(b) The reference discloses the source and price for purchase of
the publication.
 An agency shall not attempt to incorporate any other material in a
regulation by reference.
[4. An]
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 and section 1
of this act, an agency shall adopt a proposed regulation not later
than 2 years after the date on which the proposed regulation is
submitted to the Legislative Counsel pursuant to subsection 1 of
NRS 233B.063. If an agency does not adopt a proposed regulation
within the time prescribed by this subsection, the executive head of
the agency shall appear personally before the Legislative
Commission and explain why the proposed regulation has not been
adopted.
Sec. 3. NRS 218D.175 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218D.175 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
for a regular session, the Governor or the Governor’s designated
representative may request the drafting of not more than 110
legislative measures which have been approved by the Governor or
the Governor’s designated representative on behalf of the officers,
agencies, boards, commissions, departments and other units of the
Executive Department. The requests must be submitted to the
Legislative Counsel on or before August 1 preceding the regular
session.
2. The Governor or the Governor’s designated representative
may request at any time before or during a regular session, without
limitation, the drafting of as many legislative measures as are
necessary to carry out the provisions of NRS 288.400 to 288.630,
inclusive.
3. The Director of the Office of Finance may request on or
before the 19th day of a regular session, without limitation, the
-
*AB120*

– 4 –
drafting of as many legislative measures as are necessary to
implement the budget proposed by the Governor and to provide for
the fiscal management of the State [.] , including, without
limitation, the submission of a legislative measure to enact a
proposed regulation that an agency has determined, pursuant to
section 1 of this act, has an estimated economic impact of
$500,000 or more. In addition to the requests otherwise authorized
pursuant to this section, the Governor may request the drafting of
not more than 5 legislative measures on or before the 19th day of a
regular session to propose the Governor’s legislative agenda.
4. For a regular session, the following constitutional officers
may request, without the approval of the Governor or the
Governor’s designated representative, the drafting of not more than
the following numbers of legislative measures, which must be
submitted to the Legislative Counsel on or before September 1
preceding the regular session:

Lieutenant Governor ............................................................... 3
Secretary of State .................................................................... 6
State Treasurer ........................................................................ 5
State Controller ....................................................................... 5
Attorney General .................................................................. 20

5. In addition to the requests authorized by subsection 4, the
Secretary of State may request, without the approval of the
Governor or the Governor’s designated representative, the drafting
of not more than 2 legislative measures, which must be submitted to
the Legislative Counsel on or before December 31 preceding the
regular session.
6. Each request made pursuant to this section must be on a
form prescribed by the Legislative Counsel. The legislative
measures requested pursuant to subsections 1 and 4 must be prefiled
on or before the third Wednesday in November preceding the
regular session. A legislative measure that is not prefiled on or
before that day shall be deemed withdrawn.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB120*